Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1427
Director of
Juvenile Diversion Programs; appointment; duties.

(1)
There is established within the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and
Criminal Justice the position of Director of Juvenile Diversion Programs to
be appointed by the executive director of the commission.

(2) The Director of Juvenile Diversion Programs shall be
supervised by the executive director of the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement
and Criminal Justice. The director shall be responsible for fostering, promoting,
researching, and assessing juvenile pretrial diversion programs and developing
new programs in collaboration with cities and counties pursuant to sections
43-260.02 to 43-260.07. The director shall:

(a) Provide technical assistance and guidance to juvenile
pretrial diversion programs for implementing evidence-based strategies or
standardized, replicable practices that have been researched and have demonstrated
positive outcomes;

(b) Develop a core juvenile pretrial diversion program packet
for utilization by counties without a juvenile pretrial diversion program
or counties without a district probation officer acting under section 29-2258;

(c) Establish baseline program guidelines for juvenile pretrial
diversion programs based
on evidence-based practices, principles, programs, and research,
develop data collection and evaluation protocols, oversee statewide data collection,
and generate an annual report on juvenile pretrial diversion programs;

(d) Develop relationships and collaborate with juvenile justice
stakeholders involved in juvenile pretrial diversion programs, provide education
and training as necessary, and serve on boards and committees when approved
by the commission;

(e) Facilitate consistent communication and information-sharing
among juvenile pretrial diversion program directors;

(f) Assist juvenile pretrial diversion program directors,
county attorneys, district probation officers acting under section 29-2258,
and county boards in developing policies and practices that achieve the goals
of quality juvenile pretrial diversion programs;

(g) Assist in comprehensive community planning efforts as
they relate to development of juvenile pretrial diversion programs;

(h) Develop and coordinate a statewide working group as a
subcommittee of the Nebraska Coalition for Juvenile Justice to assist in regular
strategic planning related to supporting, funding, monitoring, and evaluating
the effectiveness of plans and programs receiving funds from the Community-based
Juvenile Services Aid Program; and

(i) Assist the Director of the Community-based Juvenile Services
Aid Program created under section 43-2404.01 in the review of Community-based
Juvenile Services Aid Program applications as provided in section 43-2404.02.

Laws 2013, LB561, § 53;

Laws 2014, LB464, § 36.